District of Columbia statutes.
1-807.01

Creation of Trust Fund.

(a)

Establishment. —

There is established on the books of the Treasury the District of Columbia Federal Pension Liability Trust Fund, consisting of the assets transferred pursuant to § 1-807.03 and any income earned on the investment of such assets pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

(b)

Investment of assets. —

The Trustee may invest the assets of the Trust Fund in private securities and any other form of investment deemed appropriate by the Secretary.

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 723, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11031
This section is referenced in § 1-801.02.
1981 Ed., § 1-764.1.
Payment of attorney fees: Section 130 of Pub. L. 105-277, 112 Stat. 2681-138, provided that “none of the funds contained in this Act may be made available to pay the fees of an attorney who represents a party who prevails in an action, including an administrative proceeding, brought against the District of Columbia Public Schools under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act ( 20 U.S.C. 1400 et seq.) if: (1) the hourly rate of compensation of the attorney exceeds the hourly rate of compensation under § 11-2604(a), or (2) the maximum amount of compensation of the attorney exceeds the maximum amount of compensation under § 11-2604(b)(1), except that compensation and reimbursement in excess of such maximum may be approved for extended or complex representation in accordance with § 11-2604(c).”